Illinois, session 104th, HB719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medicaid Technical Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 185-1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 75/185-1)7    Sec. 185-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Medicaid Technical Assistance Act. References in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.)